California, session 20252026, AB174.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 367.75 of the Code of Civil Procedure is amended to read:367.75. (a) (1) Except as provided in subdivisions (b) and (d), in civil cases, when a party has provided notice to the court and all other parties that it or its witness intends to appear remotely, a that party or witness may appear remotely and the court may conduct conferences, hearings, and proceedings, in whole or in part, through the use of remote technology.(2) This section does not apply to any of the following type of proceedings:(A) Any proceeding in matters identified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 367.76.(B) A juvenile justice proceeding covered by Section 679.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.(b) Except as otherwise provided by law, the court may require a party or witness to appear in person at a conference, hearing, or proceeding described in subdivision (a), or under subdivisions (e) and (h), if any of the following conditions are present:(1) The court with jurisdiction over the case does not have the technology necessary to conduct the conference, hearing, or proceeding remotely.(2) Although the court has the requisite technology, the quality of the technology or audibility at a conference, hearing, or proceeding prevents the effective management or resolution of the conference, hearing, or proceeding.(3) The court determines on a hearing-by-hearing basis that an in-person appearance would materially assist in the determination of the conference, hearing, or proceeding or in the effective management or resolution of the particular case. is necessary to the determination of the conference, hearing, or proceeding, or that remote attendance would materially impair the resolution of the conference, hearing, or proceeding. Beginning January 1, 2027, the court shall provide a reason for requiring an in-person appearance, either by stating the reason on the record, in a minute order, or on a form filed in the court’s file. The Judicial Council shall develop a form for this purpose.(4) The quality of the technology or audibility at a conference, hearing, or proceeding inhibits the court reporter’s ability to accurately prepare a transcript of the conference, hearing, or proceeding.(5) The quality of the technology or audibility at a conference, hearing, or proceeding prevents an attorney from being able to provide effective representation to the attorney’s client.(6) The quality of the technology or audibility at a conference, hearing, or proceeding inhibits a court interpreter’s ability to provide language access to a court user or authorized individual.(c) Notwithstanding paragraph (3) of subdivision (b), an expert witness may appear remotely absent good cause to compel in-person testimony.(d) (1) Except as otherwise provided by law and subject to the limitations of subdivision (b), upon its own motion or the motion of any party, the court may conduct a trial or evidentiary hearing, in whole or in part, through the use of remote technology, absent a showing by the opposing party as to why a remote appearance or testimony should not be allowed.(2) (A) Except as provided in Section 269 of the Code of Civil Procedure and Section 69957 of the Government Code, if the court conducts a trial, in whole or in part, through the use of remote technology, the official reporter or official reporter pro tempore shall be physically present in the courtroom.(B) If the court conducts a trial, in whole or in part, through the use of remote technology, upon request, the court interpreter shall be physically present in the courtroom.(e) (1) Before the court with jurisdiction over the case may proceed with a remote conference, hearing, proceeding, or trial, the court shall have a process for a party, witness, official reporter, official reporter pro tempore, court interpreter, or other court personnel to alert the judicial officer of technology or audibility issues that arise during the conference, hearing, proceeding, or trial.(2) The court shall require that a remote appearance by a party or witness have the necessary privacy and security appropriate for the conference, hearing, proceeding, or trial.(3) The court shall inform all parties, particularly parties without legal representation, about the potential technological or audibility issues that could arise when using remote technology, which may require a delay of or halt the conference, hearing, proceeding, or trial. The court shall make information available to self-represented parties regarding the options for appearing in person and through the use of remote technology.(f) The court shall not require a party to appear through the use of remote technology. If the court permits an appearance through remote technology, the court must ensure that technology in the courtroom enables all parties, whether appearing remotely or in person, to fully participate in the conference, hearing, or proceeding.(g) A self-represented party may appear remotely in a conference, hearing, or proceeding conducted through the use of remote technology only if they agree to do so.(h) Any juvenile dependency proceeding may be conducted in whole or in part through the use of remote technology subject to the following:(1) Any person authorized to be present may request to appear remotely.(2) (A) Any party to the proceeding may request that the court compel the physical presence of a witness or party. A witness, including a party providing testimony, may appear through remote technology only with the consent of all parties, except as provided in subparagraph (B), and if the witness has access to the appropriate technology.(B) A parent, child, nonminor dependent, or Indian tribe as defined in Section 224.1 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, may utilize remote technology for the appearance of an expert witness without the consent of all parties.(3) A court shall not require a party to appear through the use of remote technology.(4) The confidentiality requirements that apply to an in-person juvenile dependency proceeding shall apply to a juvenile dependency proceeding conducted through the use of remote technology.(i) (1) Notwithstanding Section 8613.5 of the Family Code, in an adoption proceeding under Division 13 (commencing with Section 8500) of the Family Code, the court may conduct an adoption finalization hearing, in whole or in part, through the use of remote technology, without the court finding that it is impossible or impracticable for either prospective adoptive parent to make the appearance in person.(2) A court shall not require a party to appear through the use of remote technology.(3) The confidentiality and privacy requirements that apply to an in-person adoption finalization hearing, including, but not limited to, the requirements in Section 8611 of the Family Code, apply to an adoption finalization hearing conducted through the use of remote technology.(j) For purposes of this section, a party includes a nonparty subject to Chapter 6 of Title 4 of Part 4 (commencing with Section 2020.010).(k) Subject to the limitations in subdivision (b), this section is not intended to prohibit the use of appearances through the use of remote technology when stipulated by attorneys for represented parties.(l) Consistent with its constitutional rulemaking authority, the Judicial Council shall adopt rules to implement the policies and provisions in this section to promote statewide consistency, including, but not limited to, the following procedures:(1) A deadline by which a party must notify the court and the other parties of their request to appear remotely.(2) Procedures and standards for a judicial officer to determine when a conference, hearing, or proceeding may be conducted through the use of remote technology. The procedures and standards shall require that a judicial officer give consideration to the limited access to technology or transportation that a party or witness might have.(m) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, 2032, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 2. Section 367.76 of the Code of Civil Procedure is amended to read:367.76. (a) (1) This section applies to proceedings in the following matters:(A) Judicial commitments under Part 2 (commencing with Section 6250) of Division 6 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, except for delinquency proceedings.(B) Involuntary treatment and conservatorships of gravely disabled persons under Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 5000), Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 5150), and Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 5350) of Part 1 of Division 5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, including Murphy conservatorships.(C) Contempt proceedings under Title 5 (commencing with Section 1209) of Part 3 of this code.(D) Mentally disordered offender proceedings under Article 4 (commencing with Section 2960) of Chapter 7 of Title 1 of Part 3 of the Penal Code.(E) Commitment proceedings under Section 1026, et seq. of the Penal Code.(F) Competency proceedings under Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 1367) of Title 10 of Part 2 of the Penal Code.(G) Placement and revocation proceedings pursuant to Section 1600 et seq. of the Penal Code.(H) Involuntary medication and treatment hearings for individuals committed or awaiting admission to a State Department of State Hospitals facility as described in Section 4100 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.(2) This section does not apply to proceedings in matters brought pursuant to Sections 601 and 602 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.(b) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Person” means the person subject to any proceeding in matters described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).(2) “Proceeding” or “proceedings” includes, but is not limited to, all hearings, conferences, and trials in matters described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).(3) “Remote technology” means technology that provides for the two-way transmission of video and audio signals except that audio signals alone may be permitted where specifically authorized by law. Remote technology shall include, but not be limited to, a computer, tablet, telephone, cellular telephone, or other electronic or communications device. Notwithstanding the foregoing and subject to subdivision (h), the person subject to the proceeding, in consultation with counsel if represented, may, at their request, participate through audio-only technology.(c) Proceedings in matters arising under subdivision (a) may be conducted through the use of remote technology subject to the following:(1) A person has the right to be physically present for all proceedings and shall not be required to appear through the use of remote technology.(2) A person may waive their right to be physically present and may elect to appear remotely.(3) Except as provided in subdivisions (d), (e), and (h), a party, counsel for a party, or witness may appear through the use of remote technology.(4) The confidentiality requirements that apply to inperson proceedings shall apply with equal force and effect when conducted through the use of remote technology.(d) If the person is physically present in court the following shall apply:(1) Absent exceptional circumstances and except as provided in paragraphs (3) and (4), counsel for the person, counsel for the other party or parties, the other party or parties, and the judicial officer shall be physically present in the courtroom.(2) Except as provided in paragraphs (3) and (4) and paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 1370 of the Penal Code, absent a waiver by the person or a finding of good cause by the court, any witness the other party or parties calls shall be physically present in the courtroom. In determining whether good cause exists to excuse the physical presence of a witness, the court shall consider the distance the witness must travel, the nature of the testimony, and the nature of the proceeding.(3) Notwithstanding paragraphs (1) and (2), counsel and witnesses for the State Department of Developmental Services shall not be required to be physically present in the courtroom absent a finding of good cause by the court.(4) Notwithstanding paragraphs (1) and (2), counsel and witnesses for the State Department of State Hospitals shall not be required to be physically present in the courtroom in any nonjury trial matters or proceedings described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) absent a finding of good cause by the court.(e) Notwithstanding any other law, unless good cause exists, a court shall not compel the physical presence of the person who is a patient in a State Department of State Hospitals or State Department of Developmental Services facility or other inpatient or outpatient treatment facility absent consent of the person in consultation with counsel. In determining whether good cause exists to compel the physical presence of a patient, the court shall consider the nature of the hearing and whether requiring the physical presence of the patient would interfere with the person’s program of treatment or be detrimental to their mental or physical health.(f) (1) Until July 1, 2024, when the court conducts proceedings that will be reported by an official reporter or official reporter pro tempore, the reporter shall be physically present in the same room as the judicial officer except where the court finds that, as the result of unusual circumstances, this requirement would place extreme or undue hardship on the court or the litigants. For purposes of this paragraph, “unusual circumstances” means a work stoppage, a circumstance described in subdivision (a) of Section 68115 of the Government Code, an unforeseen emergency, court proceedings conducted in a remote court location to which a judicial officer is not regularly assigned to sit, or when a judicial officer has to travel to a location outside of a courthouse to conduct the proceeding.(2) Beginning July 1, 2024, when the court conducts proceedings that will be reported by an official reporter or official reporter pro tempore, the reporter shall be physically present in the same room as the judicial officer if the court cannot provide the technology standards described in subdivision (o).(g) If the court conducts a trial, in whole or in part, through the use of remote technology, upon request, the court interpreter shall be physically present in the courtroom.(h) (1) If any of the following conditions are present and cannot be resolved, the court shall not permit any party, counsel, or witness to appear or participate in proceedings through the use of remote technology, and shall continue any proceeding being conducted with the use of remote technology:(A) The court does not have the technology necessary to conduct the proceeding remotely.(B) Although the court has the requisite technology, the quality of the technology or audibility at a proceeding prevents the effective management or resolution of the proceeding.(C) The quality of the technology or audibility at a proceeding inhibits the court reporter’s ability to accurately prepare and certify a transcript of the proceeding.(D) The court reporter is unable to capture the verbatim record and certify a transcript of any proceeding that is conducted remotely, in whole or in part, to the same extent and in the same manner as if it were not conducted remotely.(E) The quality of the technology or audibility at a proceeding inhibits the ability of the person to understand or participate in the proceeding.(F) The quality of the technology or audibility at a proceeding inhibits counsel from being able to provide effective representation to the person.(G) The court does not have the technology necessary for secure, confidential communication between counsel and the person.(H) The quality of the technology or audibility at a proceeding inhibits a court interpreter’s ability to provide language access, including to communicate and interpret directly with the person and the court during the proceedings.(2) Except as provided in subdivision (e) or otherwise provided by law, the court may require a party or witness to appear in person at a proceeding if the court determines on a hearing-by-hearing basis that an inperson appearance would materially assist in the determination of the proceeding or resolution of the case. The court’s determination shall be based on the individual case before the court and shall be entered into the minutes or otherwise made on the record. In making its determination, the court shall consider the request of the person, the nature of the proceedings, and whether requiring the physical presence of the person would disrupt the person’s program of treatment or be detrimental to their mental or physical health.(3) The court shall not continue proceedings beyond statutory time limits pursuant to this section absent a waiver by the person in consultation with counsel.(i) Subject to the limitations in subdivision (h), this section is not intended to prohibit the use of appearances through the use of remote technology when stipulated by attorneys for represented parties.(j) Before the court may conduct proceedings through the use of remote technology, the court shall have a process for a party, witness, official reporter, official reporter pro tempore, court interpreter, or other court personnel to alert the judicial officer of technology or audibility issues that arise during the proceedings.(k) The court shall inform all parties, particularly parties without legal representation, about the potential technological or audibility issues that could arise when using remote technology, which may require a delay of or halt the proceedings. The court shall make information available to self-represented parties regarding the options for appearing in person and through the use of remote technology.(l) A self-represented party may appear remotely in a proceeding conducted through the use of remote technology only if they agree to do so.(m) For purposes of this section, a party includes a nonparty subject to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 2020.010) of Title 4 of Part 4.(n) Consistent with its constitutional rulemaking authority, the Judicial Council shall adopt such other rules and standards as are necessary to implement the policies and provisions of this section and the intent of the Legislature.(o)  By April 1, 2024, the Judicial Council shall adopt, and trial courts shall implement by July 1, 2024, minimum standards for the courtroom technology necessary to permit remote participation in proceedings subject to this section. Those standards shall include, but not be limited to, hard-wired or other reliable high-speed internet connections in the courtroom for the judicial officer and court reporter, and monitors, dedicated cameras, speakers, and microphones so the judicial officer, court reporter, and court interpreter can appropriately see and hear remote participants, as well as to ensure that remote participants can appropriately see and hear the judicial officer and other courtroom participants.(p) Consistent with federal and California labor law, a trial court shall not retaliate or threaten to retaliate against an official reporter or an official reporter pro tempore who notifies the judicial officer that technology or audibility issues are impeding the creation of the verbatim record of a proceeding that includes participation through remote technology. This subdivision shall only apply to an official reporter and an official reporter pro tempore when they meet the definition of “trial court employee” under subdivision (l) of Section 71601 of the Government Code.(q) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, 2032, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 3. Section 367.8 of the Code of Civil Procedure is amended to read:367.8. (a) Each superior court shall report to the Judicial Council on or before October 1, 2023, and annually thereafter, and the Judicial Council shall report to the Legislature on or before December 31, 2023, and annually thereafter, to assess the impact of technology issues or problems affecting remote proceedings, as included under Sections 367.75 and 367.76 of this code, and Section 679.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, and all purchases and leases of technology or equipment to facilitate remote conferences, hearings, or proceedings. The report by each superior court and the Judicial Council shall specify all of the following for each annual reporting period:(1) The number of proceedings conducted with the use of remote technology.(2) Any superior court in which technology issues or problems occurred.(3) The superior courts in which remote technology was used.(4) The types of trial court conferences, hearings, or proceedings in which remote technology was used.(5) The cost of purchasing, leasing, or upgrading remote technology.(6) The type of technology and equipment purchased or leased.(7) Any other information necessary to evaluate the use of remote proceedings by the courts.(b) Each superior court shall report to the Judicial Council on or before October 1, 2025, and annually thereafter, and the Judicial Council shall report to the Legislature on or before December 31, 2025, and annually thereafter, the information identified in subdivision (a) to assess the impact of technology issues or problems affecting criminal remote proceedings, as included under Sections 977, 977.3, and 1043.5 of the Penal Code.(c) (1) By October 1, 2025, and annually thereafter, the court executive officer of each superior court shall certify to the Judicial Council, in a form and manner determined by the Judicial Council, that each courtroom of the superior court in which the court is conducting a remote proceeding meets the minimum standards for courtroom technology required pursuant to subdivision (o) of Section 367.76 of this code, subdivision (j) of Section 977 of the Penal Code, or subdivision (n) of Section 679.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.(2) By December 31, 2025, and annually thereafter, the Judicial Council shall report the information identified in paragraph (1) to the Legislature.(d) A report to be submitted to the Legislature pursuant to this section shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.(e) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, 2032, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 4. Section 69894 of the Government Code is amended to read:69894. (a) The superior court shall provide any court user access to a lactation room in any courthouse in which a lactation room is also provided to court employees in compliance with Section 1031 of the Labor Code. The lactation room for court users shall be located within the court facility in an area that is accessible to the public or in any location that is reasonably accessible to the public using the court facility.(b) A superior court may comply with this section by designating a lactation room for court users that does not meet all of the requirements of subdivision (d) of Section 1031 of the Labor Code in order to provide the greatest number of court users with access to lactation rooms in as many courthouses as possible. The superior court shall use the most cost effective means possible to construct or renovate lactation rooms in courthouses, including by installing portable lactation rooms where appropriate, due to operational, financial, or space limitations. The lactation room shall not be a bathroom, shall be shielded from view and free from intrusion while it is being used by a court user to express milk, and shall otherwise comply with the requirements of subdivision (c) of Section 1031 of the Labor Code.(c) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2026. 2029.SEC. 5. Section 71651.1 of the Government Code is amended to read:71651.1. (a) Consistent with federal and California labor law, a trial court shall not retaliate against an official reporter or official reporter pro tempore who notifies the judicial officer that technology or audibility issues are interfering with the creation of the verbatim record for a remote proceeding pursuant to subdivisions (f) and (g) of Section 977 of the Penal Code.(b) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, 2032, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 6. Section 977 of the Penal Code, as amended by Section 10 of Chapter 51 of the Statutes of 2024, is amended to read:977. (a) (1) In all cases in which the accused is charged with a misdemeanor only, they may appear by counsel only, except as provided in paragraphs (2) and (3). If the accused agrees, the initial court appearance, arraignment, plea, and all other proceedings, except jury and court trials, may be conducted remotely through the use of technology, as provided by subdivision (c).(2) If the accused is charged with a misdemeanor offense involving domestic violence, as defined in Section 6211 of the Family Code, or a misdemeanor violation of Section 273.6, the accused shall be present for arraignment and sentencing, and at any time during the proceedings when ordered by the court for the purpose of being informed of the conditions of a protective order issued pursuant to Section 136.2.(3) If the accused is charged with a misdemeanor offense involving driving under the influence, in an appropriate case, the court may order a defendant to be present for arraignment, at the time of plea, or at sentencing. For purposes of this paragraph, a misdemeanor offense involving driving under the influence shall include a misdemeanor violation of any of the following:(A) Subdivision (b) of Section 191.5.(B) Section 23103 as specified in Section 23103.5 of the Vehicle Code.(C) Section 23152 of the Vehicle Code.(D) Section 23153 of the Vehicle Code.(b) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (c), in all cases in which a felony is charged, the accused shall be physically present at the arraignment, at the time of plea, during the preliminary hearing, during those portions of the trial when evidence is taken before the trier of fact, and at the time of the imposition of sentence. The accused shall be physically or remotely present at all other proceedings unless they waive their right to be physically or remotely present, with leave of court and with approval by defendant’s counsel.(2) The waiver of a defendant’s right to be physically or remotely present may be in writing and filed with the court or, with the court’s consent, may be entered personally by the defendant or by the defendant’s counsel of record.(A) A defendant’s personal waiver of the right to be physically or remotely present shall be on the record and state that the defendant has been advised of the right to be physically or remotely present for the hearing at issue and agrees that notice to the attorney that the defendant’s physical or remote presence in court at a future date and time is required is notice to the defendant of that requirement.(B) A waiver of the defendant’s physical or remote presence may be entered by counsel, after counsel has stated on the record that the defendant has been advised of the right to be physically or remotely present for the hearing at issue, has waived that right, and agrees that notice to the attorney that the defendant’s physical or remote presence in court at a future date and time is required is notice to the defendant of that requirement.(3) The court may specifically direct the defendant, either personally or through counsel, to be physically or remotely present at any particular proceeding or portion thereof, including upon request of a victim, to the extent required by Section 28 of Article I of the California Constitution.(4) A written waiver of the defendant’s physical or remote presence shall be substantially in the following form:“Waiver of Defendant’s Physical or Remote Presence”“The undersigned defendant, having been advised of their right to be present at all stages of the proceedings, including, but not limited to, presentation of and arguments on questions of fact and law, and to be confronted by and cross-examine all witnesses, hereby knowingly, intelligently, and voluntarily waives the right to be physically or remotely present at the hearing of any motion or other proceeding in this cause. The undersigned defendant hereby requests the court to proceed during every absence of the defendant that the court may permit pursuant to this waiver, and hereby agrees that their interest is represented at all times by the presence of their attorney the same as if the defendant were physically or remotely present in court, and further agrees that notice to their attorney that their physical or remote presence in court on a particular day at a particular time is required is notice to the defendant of the requirement of their physical or remote appearance at that time and place.”(c) (1) (A) Upon waiver of the right to be physically present by the defendant, criminal proceedings may be conducted through the use of remote technology, except as provided in subparagraphs (D) and (E). The defendant may withdraw the waiver at any time.(B) The court may specifically direct the defendant, either personally or through counsel, to be physically present at any particular felony proceeding or portion thereof, including as provided in subdivision (f).(C) If the defendant is represented by counsel, the attorney shall not be required to be physically present with the defendant if remote technology allows for private communication between the defendant and the attorney prior to and during the proceeding, unless, upon request of defense counsel, the court allows the appearance without private communication. Any private communication shall be confidential and privileged pursuant to Section 952 of the Evidence Code.(D) A defendant charged with a felony or misdemeanor shall not appear remotely for a jury trial or court trial, except as provided in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2).(E) A defendant charged with a felony shall not appear remotely at sentencing, except for postconviction relief proceedings and as otherwise provided by law.(F) A witness may appear at any misdemeanor or felony criminal proceeding, except for felony trial, remotely pursuant to Section 977.3.(2) (A) A felony defendant who does not wish to be physically or remotely present for noncritical portions of the trial when no testimonial evidence is taken may make an oral waiver in open court prior to the proceeding, or may submit a written request to the court, which the court may grant in its discretion.(B) This paragraph does not expand or limit the right of a defendant to be personally present with their counsel at a particular proceeding as required by Section 15 of Article 1 of the California Constitution.(d) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision in this section, the court may allow a defendant to appear by counsel on that day, at a trial, hearing, or other proceeding, with or without a written waiver, if the court finds, by clear and convincing evidence, all of the following to be true:(A) The defendant is in custody and is refusing, without good cause, to appear in court on that day for that trial, hearing, or other proceeding.(B) The defendant has been informed of their right and obligation to be personally present in court.(C) The defendant has been informed that the trial, hearing, or other proceeding will proceed without the defendant being present.(D) The defendant has been informed that they have the right to remain silent during the trial, hearing, or other proceeding.(E) The defendant has been informed that their absence without good cause will constitute a voluntary waiver of any constitutional or statutory right to confront any witnesses against them or to testify on their own behalf.(F) The defendant has been informed whether or not defense counsel will be present.(2) The court shall state on the record the reasons for the court’s findings and shall cause those findings and reasons to be entered into the minutes.(3) If the trial, hearing, or other proceeding lasts for more than one day, the court is required to make the findings required by this subdivision anew for each day that the defendant is absent.(4) This subdivision does not apply to any trial, hearing, or other proceeding in which the defendant was personally present in court at the commencement of the trial, hearing, or other proceeding.(e) A court may, as appropriate and practicable, allow a prosecuting attorney or defense counsel to participate in a criminal proceeding through the use of remote technology without being physically present in the courtroom and in accordance with subdivision (f).(f) Except as otherwise provided by law, the court shall require a prosecuting attorney, defense counsel, defendant, or witness to appear in person at a proceeding, if any of the following conditions are present and cannot be resolved in a reasonable amount of time:(1) The court does not have the technology necessary to conduct the proceeding remotely.(2) Although the court has the requisite technology, the quality of the technology or audibility at a proceeding prevents the effective management or resolution of the proceeding.(3) The quality of the technology or audibility at a proceeding inhibits the court reporter’s ability to accurately prepare and certify a transcript of the proceeding.(4) The quality of the technology or audibility at a proceeding prevents defense counsel from being able to provide effective representation to the defendant.(5) The quality of the technology or audibility at a proceeding inhibits a court interpreter’s ability to provide language access, including the ability to communicate and translate directly with the defendant and the court during the proceeding.(g) (1) Before the court may proceed with a remote proceeding, the court shall have a process for a defendant, defense counsel, prosecuting attorney, witness, official reporter, official reporter pro tempore, court interpreter, or other court personnel to alert the judicial officer of technological or audibility issues that arise during the proceeding.(2) When the court conducts a remote proceeding that will be reported by an official reporter or official reporter pro tempore, the reporter shall be physically present in the same room as the judicial officer unless doing so would cause a significant delay that would prejudice the parties, in which case the reporter shall be physically present in a court facility. If the reporter is not in the same room as the judicial officer, the reporter shall be given the ability to mute and unmute their own audio to allow for communication with the judicial officer.(h) The court shall make findings on the record that any waiver entered into pursuant to this section is knowingly, voluntarily, and intelligently made by the defendant.(i) The court shall require any party, witness, or attorney who participates remotely in a criminal proceeding to conduct themselves as if they were appearing physically in the courtroom. Any person speaking on the record shall have their name displayed or state their name.(j) By April 1, 2025, the Judicial Council shall adopt, and courts shall implement by July 1, 2025, minimum standards for the courtroom technology necessary to permit remote participation in criminal proceedings. The standards shall include, but not be limited to, hard-wired or other reliable high-speed internet connections for the judicial officer and court reporter, and monitors, dedicated cameras, speakers, and microphones so the judicial officer, court reporter, and court interpreter can appropriately see and hear remote participants, as well as to ensure that remote participants can appropriately see and hear the judicial officer and other courtroom participants. Court technology shall allow remote participants to be identified during the proceeding to ensure an accurate record.(k) The Judicial Council shall adopt rules and standards that are necessary to implement the policies and provisions of this section and the intent of the Legislature.(l) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, 2032, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 7. Section 977 of the Penal Code, as amended by Section 11 of Chapter 51 of the Statutes of 2024, is amended to read:977. (a) (1) In all cases in which the accused is charged with a misdemeanor only, they may appear by counsel only, except as provided in paragraphs (2) and (3). If the accused agrees, the initial court appearance, arraignment, and plea may be by video, as provided by subdivision (c).(2) If the accused is charged with a misdemeanor offense involving domestic violence, as defined in Section 6211 of the Family Code, or a misdemeanor violation of Section 273.6, the accused shall be present for arraignment and sentencing, and at any time during the proceedings when ordered by the court for the purpose of being informed of the conditions of a protective order issued pursuant to Section 136.2.(3) If the accused is charged with a misdemeanor offense involving driving under the influence, in an appropriate case, the court may order a defendant to be present for arraignment, at the time of plea, or at sentencing. For purposes of this paragraph, a misdemeanor offense involving driving under the influence shall include a misdemeanor violation of any of the following:(A) Subdivision (b) of Section 191.5.(B) Section 23103 as specified in Section 23103.5 of the Vehicle Code.(C) Section 23152 of the Vehicle Code.(D) Section 23153 of the Vehicle Code.(b) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (c), in all cases in which a felony is charged, the accused shall be personally present at the arraignment, at the time of plea, during the preliminary hearing, during those portions of the trial when evidence is taken before the trier of fact, and at the time of the imposition of sentence. The accused shall be personally present at all other proceedings unless they shall, with leave of court, execute in open court, a written waiver of their right to be personally present, as provided by paragraph (2). If the accused agrees, the initial court appearance, arraignment, and plea may be by video, as provided by subdivision (c).(2) The accused may execute a written waiver of their right to be personally present, approved by their counsel, and the waiver shall be filed with the court. However, the court may specifically direct the defendant to be personally present at any particular proceeding or portion thereof. The waiver shall be substantially in the following form:“Waiver of Defendant’s Personal Presence”“The undersigned defendant, having been advised of their right to be present at all stages of the proceedings, including, but not limited to, presentation of and arguments on questions of fact and law, and to be confronted by and cross-examine all witnesses, hereby waives the right to be present at the hearing of any motion or other proceeding in this cause. The undersigned defendant hereby requests the court to proceed during every absence of the defendant that the court may permit pursuant to this waiver, and hereby agrees that their interest is represented at all times by the presence of their attorney the same as if the defendant were personally present in court, and further agrees that notice to their attorney that their presence in court on a particular day at a particular time is required is notice to the defendant of the requirement of their appearance at that time and place.”(c) (1) The court may permit the initial court appearance and arraignment of defendants held in any state, county, or local facility within the county on felony or misdemeanor charges, except for those defendants who were indicted by a grand jury, to be conducted by two-way electronic audiovideo communication between the defendant and the courtroom in lieu of the physical presence of the defendant in the courtroom. If the defendant is represented by counsel, the attorney shall be present with the defendant at the initial court appearance and arraignment, and may enter a plea during the arraignment. However, if the defendant is represented by counsel at an arraignment on an information in a felony case, and if the defendant does not plead guilty or nolo contendere to any charge, the attorney shall be present with the defendant or if the attorney is not present with the defendant, the attorney shall be present in court during the hearing. The defendant shall have the right to make their plea while physically present in the courtroom if they request to do so. If the defendant decides not to exercise the right to be physically present in the courtroom they shall execute a written waiver of that right. A judge may order a defendant’s personal appearance in court for the initial court appearance and arraignment. In a misdemeanor case, a judge may, pursuant to this subdivision, accept a plea of guilty or no contest from a defendant who is not physically in the courtroom. In a felony case, a judge may, pursuant to this subdivision, accept a plea of guilty or no contest from a defendant who is not physically in the courtroom if the parties stipulate thereto.(2) (A) A defendant who does not wish to be personally present for noncritical portions of the trial when no testimonial evidence is taken may make an oral waiver in open court prior to the proceeding or may submit a written request to the court, which the court may grant in its discretion. The court may, when a defendant has waived the right to be personally present, require a defendant held in any state, county, or local facility within the county on felony or misdemeanor charges to be present for noncritical portions of the trial when no testimonial evidence is taken, including, but not limited to, confirmation of the preliminary hearing, status conferences, trial readiness conferences, discovery motions, receipt of records, the setting of the trial date, a motion to vacate the trial date, and motions in limine, by two-way electronic audiovideo communication between the defendant and the courtroom in lieu of the physical presence of the defendant in the courtroom. If the defendant is represented by counsel, the attorney shall not be required to be personally present with the defendant for noncritical portions of the trial, if the audiovideo conferencing system or other technology allows for private communication between the defendant and the attorney prior to and during the noncritical portion of trial. Any private communication shall be confidential and privileged pursuant to Section 952 of the Evidence Code.(B) This paragraph does not expand or limit the right of a defendant to be personally present with their counsel at a particular proceeding as required by Section 15 of Article 1 of the California Constitution.(d) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision in this section, the court may allow a defendant to appear by counsel on that day, at a trial, hearing, or other proceeding, with or without a written waiver, if the court finds, by clear and convincing evidence, all of the following to be true:(A) The defendant is in custody and is refusing, without good cause, to appear in court on that day for that trial, hearing, or other proceeding.(B) The defendant has been informed of their right and obligation to be personally present in court.(C) The defendant has been informed that the trial, hearing, or other proceeding will proceed without the defendant being present.(D) The defendant has been informed that they have the right to remain silent during the trial, hearing, or other proceeding.(E) The defendant has been informed that their absence without good cause will constitute a voluntary waiver of any constitutional or statutory right to confront any witnesses against them or to testify on their own behalf.(F) The defendant has been informed whether or not defense counsel will be present.(2) The court shall state on the record the reasons for the court’s findings and shall cause those findings and reasons to be entered into the minutes.(3) If the trial, hearing, or other proceeding lasts for more than one day, the court is required to make the findings required by this subdivision anew for each day that the defendant is absent.(4) This subdivision does not apply to any trial, hearing, or other proceeding in which the defendant was personally present in court at the commencement of the trial, hearing, or other proceeding.(e) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2027. 2032.SEC. 8. Section 977.3 of the Penal Code is amended to read:977.3. (a) A witness may testify in any misdemeanor or felony criminal proceeding, except for felony trials, through the use of remote technology with the written or oral consent of the parties on the record and with the consent of the court. The defendant shall waive the right to have a witness testify in person on the record and may withdraw this waiver at any time upon finding of good cause.(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the court may allow a witness to testify through the use of remote technology as otherwise provided by statutes regarding the examination of victims of sexual crimes and conditional examinations of witnesses.(c) The court shall make findings on the record that any waiver entered into pursuant to this section is knowingly, voluntarily, and intelligently made by the defendant.(d) A written waiver of a witness’s physical presence at a misdemeanor jury trial shall be substantially in the following form:“Waiver of a Witness’s Physical Presence at Misdemeanor Jury Trials”“The undersigned defendant, having been advised of their right to have [name of witness] be physically present at a misdemeanor jury trial, hereby knowingly, intelligently, and voluntarily waives the right to have [name of witness] be physically present at the misdemeanor jury trial. The undersigned defendant may withdraw this consent at any time upon a finding of good cause. Good cause to withdraw consent is satisfied when the quality of the technology or audibility at the misdemeanor jury trial inhibits the court reporter’s ability to accurately prepare and certify a transcript of the proceeding.”(e) The Judicial Council shall adopt rules and standards that are necessary to implement the policies and provisions of this section and the intent of the Legislature.(f) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, 2032, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 9. Section 1043.5 of the Penal Code, as amended by Section 13 of Chapter 51 of the Statutes of 2024, is amended to read:1043.5. (a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the defendant in a preliminary hearing shall be personally present.(b) The absence of the defendant in a preliminary hearing after the hearing has commenced in their physical presence shall not prevent continuing the hearing to, and including, holding to answer, filing an information, or discharging the defendant in any of the following cases:(1) Any case in which the defendant, after being warned by the judge that they will be removed if they continued their disruptive behavior, nevertheless insists on acting in a manner so disorderly, disruptive, and disrespectful of the court that the hearing cannot be carried on with the defendant present in the courtroom.(2) Any prosecution for an offense which is not punishable by death in which the defendant is voluntarily absent.(c) Any defendant who is absent from a preliminary hearing pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) may reclaim their right to be present at the hearing as soon as they are willing to act consistently with the decorum and respect inherent in the concept of courts and judicial proceedings.(d) Subdivisions (a) and (b) shall not limit the right of a defendant to waive the right to be physically present or to appear through the use of remote technology in accordance with Section 977.(e) (1) For purposes of subdivision (b), a preliminary hearing shall be deemed to have commenced in the presence of the defendant if the court finds, by clear and convincing evidence, all of the following to be true:(A) The defendant is in custody and is refusing, without good cause, to appear in court on that day for that preliminary hearing.(B) The defendant has been informed of their right and obligation to be personally present in court.(C) The defendant has been informed that the preliminary hearing will proceed without the defendant being present.(D) The defendant has been informed that they have the right to remain silent during the preliminary hearing.(E) The defendant has been informed that their absence without good cause will constitute a voluntary waiver of any constitutional or statutory right to confront any witnesses against them or to testify on their own behalf.(F) The defendant has been informed whether or not defense counsel will be present.(2) The court shall state on the record the reasons for the court’s findings and shall cause those findings and reasons to be entered into the minutes.(3) If the preliminary hearing lasts for more than one day, the court is required to make the findings required by this subdivision anew for each day that the defendant is absent.(4) This subdivision does not apply to any preliminary hearing in which the defendant was personally present in court at the commencement of the preliminary hearing.(f) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, 2032, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 10. Section 1043.5 of the Penal Code, as amended by Section 14 of Chapter 51 of the Statutes of 2024, is amended to read:1043.5. (a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the defendant in a preliminary hearing shall be personally present.(b) The absence of the defendant in a preliminary hearing after the hearing has commenced in their physical presence shall not prevent continuing the hearing to, and including, holding to answer, filing an information, or discharging the defendant in any of the following cases:(1) Any case in which the defendant, after being warned by the judge that they will be removed if they continued their disruptive behavior, nevertheless insists on acting in a manner so disorderly, disruptive, and disrespectful of the court that the hearing cannot be carried on with the defendant present in the courtroom.(2) Any prosecution for an offense which is not punishable by death in which the defendant is voluntarily absent.(c) Any defendant who is absent from a preliminary hearing pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) may reclaim their right to be present at the hearing as soon as they are willing to act consistently with the decorum and respect inherent in the concept of courts and judicial proceedings.(d) Subdivisions (a) and (b) shall not limit the right of a defendant to waive the right to be present in accordance with Section 977.(e) (1) For purposes of subdivision (b), a preliminary hearing shall be deemed to have commenced in the presence of the defendant if the court finds, by clear and convincing evidence, all of the following to be true:(A) The defendant is in custody and is refusing, without good cause, to appear in court on that day for that preliminary hearing.(B) The defendant has been informed of their right and obligation to be personally present in court.(C) The defendant has been informed that the preliminary hearing will proceed without the defendant being present.(D) The defendant has been informed that they have the right to remain silent during the preliminary hearing.(E) The defendant has been informed that their absence without good cause will constitute a voluntary waiver of any constitutional or statutory right to confront any witnesses against them or to testify on their own behalf.(F) The defendant has been informed whether or not defense counsel will be present.(2) The court shall state on the record the reasons for the court’s findings and shall cause those findings and reasons to be entered into the minutes.(3) If the preliminary hearing lasts for more than one day, the court is required to make the findings required by this subdivision anew for each day that the defendant is absent.(4) This subdivision does not apply to any preliminary hearing in which the defendant was personally present in court at the commencement of the preliminary hearing.(f) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2027. 2032.SEC. 11. Section 679.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:679.5. (a) A juvenile justice proceeding may be conducted in whole or in part through the use of remote technology, subject to the provisions of this section.(b) As used in this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Juvenile justice proceeding” means a conference, hearing, or proceeding pursuant to Section 601 or 602.(2) “Minor” means a person subject to a petition pursuant to Section 601 or 602.(3) “Remote proceeding” means a juvenile justice proceeding conducted in whole or in part through the use of remote technology.(4) “Remote technology” means technology that provides for the two-way transmission of video and audio signals except that audio signals alone may be permitted where specifically authorized by subdivision (k) of Section 224.2. Remote technology shall include, but not be limited to, a computer, tablet, telephone, cellular telephone, or other electronic or communications device. Notwithstanding the foregoing, and subject to subdivision (i), a minor, minor’s family member or guardian, at the individual’s request, may participate through audio only technology.(c) Except as provided in subdivisions (d), (e), and (f), a minor has the right to be physically present in any juvenile justice proceeding and has the right, subject to express waiver, to the physical presence of defense counsel, any prosecution witnesses whom the prosecution calls to testify, and the judicial officer.(d) A minor, in consultation with counsel, may waive their right to be physically present and may elect to appear remotely. The court shall take the waiver on the record, but the waiver may be taken remotely. If the minor waives their right to be physically present, the minor, in consultation with counsel, also may waive their right to physical presence of persons identified in subdivision (c).(e) If the minor is physically present in court, defense counsel shall be physically present absent exceptional circumstances and subject to the express waiver of the minor. If a minor waives their right to be physically present and appears remotely, defense counsel may also appear remotely.(f) A minor’s parent or guardian may appear through remote technology, subject to the court’s authority to require the person to be physically present, in accordance, and consistent, with subdivision (i).(g) A minor retains the same constitutional rights as a criminal defendant to confront and cross-examine witnesses.(h) The court shall not require any party or witness to appear through the use of remote technology.(i) (1) If any of the following conditions are present and cannot be resolved, the court shall not permit any party, counsel, or witness to appear or participate in a juvenile justice proceeding through the use of remote technology, and shall continue any juvenile justice proceeding being conducted with remote technology:(A) The court does not have the technology necessary to conduct the juvenile justice proceeding remotely.(B) Although the court has the requisite technology, the quality of the technology or audibility prevents the effective management or resolution of the juvenile justice proceeding.(C) The quality of the technology or audibility at a juvenile justice proceeding inhibits the court reporter’s ability to accurately prepare and certify a transcript of the juvenile justice proceeding.(D) The court reporter is unable to capture the verbatim record and certify a transcript of any proceeding that is conducted remotely, in whole or in part, to the same extent and in the same manner as if it were not conducted remotely.(E) The quality of the technology or audibility at a juvenile justice proceeding prevents an attorney from being able to provide effective representation to the attorney’s client.(F) The quality of the technology or audibility at a juvenile justice proceeding inhibits a court interpreter’s ability to provide language access to a court user or authorized individual.(2) Except as otherwise provided by law, the court may require a party or witness to appear in person if the court determines on a hearing-by-hearing basis that an inperson appearance would materially assist in the determination of the proceeding or the resolution of the case. The court’s determination shall be based on the individual case before the court and the basis for the determination shall be stated on the record. In making its determination, the court shall consider the request of the minor, the nature of the proceedings, and whether requiring the physical presence of the minor would disrupt the education, employment, treatment, or case plan of the minor or would otherwise result in a significant hardship to the minor or the minor’s family.(j) If, at any time during a remote proceeding, the court determines that an inperson appearance is necessary, the court may require such an appearance and continue the matter for only a period of time that is necessary to ensure the party or witness is physically present, considering the factors specified in subdivision (i). The court shall only continue the matter for such period of time as is necessary to ensure the matter can be heard in person. The court shall not continue proceedings beyond statutory time limits pursuant to this section absent a waiver by the minor in consultation with counsel.(k) (1) Until July 1, 2024, when the court conducts proceedings that will be reported by an official reporter or official reporter pro tempore, the reporter shall be physically present in the same room as the judicial officer except where the court finds that, as the result of unusual circumstances, this requirement would place extreme or undue hardship on the court or the litigants. For purposes of this paragraph, “unusual circumstances” means a work stoppage, a circumstance described in paragraph (a) of Section 68115 of the Government Code, an unforeseen emergency, court proceedings conducted in a remote court location to which a judicial officer is not regularly assigned to sit, or when a judicial officer has to travel to a location outside a courthouse to conduct the proceeding.(2) Beginning July 1, 2024, when the court conducts proceedings that will be reported by an official reporter or official reporter pro tempore, the reporter shall be physically present in the same room as the judicial officer if the court cannot provide the technology standards described in subdivision (n).(l) The court may develop local procedures or protocols that benefit minors and families, while ensuring that the constitutional and statutory rights of the minor are protected in remote proceedings, and that a party is not prejudiced by lack of access to, or ability to effectively use, remote technology in any juvenile justice proceeding.(m) When conducting remote proceedings, the court shall, at a minimum, do all of the following:(1) Ensure that any party appearing remotely can participate in the proceeding in real time, with no delay in aural or visual transmission or reception.(2) Ensure that the statements of participants are audible to all other participants and court staff and that the statements made by a participant are identifiable as being made by that participant.(3) Ensure that any juvenile justice proceeding that is conducted remotely, in whole or in part, is reported to the same extent and in the same manner as if it were not conducted remotely.(4) Ensure that the quality of the technology or audibility at a remote proceeding does not prevent an attorney from being able to provide effective representation to the attorney’s client.(5) Ensure that a minor appearing remotely is able to communicate confidentially with their attorney during the remote proceeding and provide timely notice to all parties of the steps necessary to secure confidential communication. A request for a confidential attorney-client communication during the remote proceeding shall be granted by the court to ensure effective representation of the minor under the California and the United States Constitutions.(6) Ensure that the quality of the technology or audibility at a remote proceeding does not inhibit the court reporter’s ability to accurately prepare and certify a transcript of the remote proceeding.(7) Ensure that the quality of the technology or audibility at a remote proceeding does not inhibit a court interpreter’s ability to provide language access to a minor, a parent, or other individual ordered by the court to have access to court interpreter services.(8) Ensure there is a process, before the court with jurisdiction over the case proceeds with a remote proceeding, for a party, witness, official reporter, official reporter pro tempore, court interpreter, or other court personnel to alert the judicial officer of technology or audibility issues that arise during the remote proceeding.(9) Ensure that the juvenile justice proceedings remain confidential, as required by law.(10) Permit a party to appear in person for a juvenile justice proceeding at the time and place for which the proceeding was noticed, even if that party had previously notified the court of an intent to appear remotely.(11) Publish information online providing the instructions necessary for participants to appear remotely.(n) By April 1, 2024, the Judicial Council shall adopt, and trial courts shall implement by July 1, 2024, minimum standards for the courtroom technology necessary to permit remote participation in juvenile justice proceedings. Such standards shall include, but not be limited to, hard-wired or other reliable high-speed internet connections in the courtroom for the judicial officer and court reporter, and monitors, dedicated cameras, speakers, and microphones so the judicial officer, court reporter, and court interpreter can appropriately see and hear remote participants, as well as to ensure that remote participants can appropriately see and hear the judicial officer and other courtroom participants.(o) Consistent with federal and California labor law, a trial court shall not retaliate or threaten to retaliate against an official reporter or official reporter pro tempore who notifies the judicial officer that technology or audibility issues are impeding the creation of the verbatim record of a proceeding conducted pursuant to this section that includes participation through remote technology. This subdivision shall only apply to an official reporter and official reporter pro tempore when they meet the definition of “trial court employee” under subdivision (l) of Section 71601 of the Government Code.(p) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, 2032, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 12. The sum of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) is hereby appropriated for the 2026–27 fiscal year from the General Fund to the Judicial Council for purposes of facility modifications related to lactation rooms.SEC. 13. This act is a bill providing for appropriations related to the Budget Bill within the meaning of subdivision (e) of Section 12 of Article IV of the California Constitution, has been identified as related to the budget in the Budget Bill, and shall take effect immediately.SECTION 1.It is the intent of the Legislature to enact statutory changes relating to the Budget Act of 2025.